Hawaii statutes.
[§659-8] Service. The writ or order
shall be served in the same manner as is provided by the rules of court with
respect to process in a civil action. [L 1876, c 39, §43; RL 1925, §2723; RL
1935, §4265; RL 1945, §10286; RL 1955, §236-26; HRS §659-53; am L 1972, c 90,
§3(h); ren HRS §659-8]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next